Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.400

Cooperation and agreements with other agencies.

The director is authorized to cooperate with and enter into agreements with any other agency of the state, the United States, and any other state or agency thereof for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter and securing uniformity of regulation.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 40.]